Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Article 3. Governance.

Sec. 21.84.059.
Amendments to laws.

A domestic society may amend its laws in accordance with its provisions by action of its supreme governing body at a regular or special meeting or, if its laws provide, by referendum. The referendum may be held in accordance with the provisions of its laws by the vote of the voting members of the society, by the vote of delegates or representatives of voting members, or by the vote of local lodges. A society may provide for voting by mail. An amendment submitted for adoption by referendum may not be adopted unless, within six months from the date of submission of the amendment, at least two-thirds of the members voting signify consent to the amendment by one of the methods specified under this subsection.

An amendment to the laws of a domestic society may not take effect unless approved by the director. The director shall approve the amendment if the director finds that it has been legally adopted and is not inconsistent with the requirements of the laws of this state or with the character, objects, and purposes of the society. Unless the director disapproves the amendment within 60 days after it is filed, the amendment is considered approved. The approval or disapproval of the director shall be in writing and mailed to the secretary or corresponding officer of the society at its principal office. If the director disapproves the amendment, the reason for the disapproval shall be stated in the written notice.

Within 90 days from the approval of the amendments by the director, all amendments, or a synopsis of them, shall be furnished to all members of the society, either by mail or by publication in full in the official publication of the society. The affidavit of an officer of the society or of a person authorized by the society to mail amendments, or a synopsis of them, stating facts that show that the amendments have been addressed and mailed, is prima facie evidence that the amendments, or a synopsis of them, have been furnished to the addressee.

A foreign or alien society authorized to do business in this state shall file with the director a certified copy of all amendments of, or additions to, its laws within 90 days after the enactment of them.

Printed copies of the laws, as amended, certified by the secretary or corresponding officer of the society are prima facie evidence of the legal adoption of those laws.

History.

(§ 5 ch 96 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.84.060.
Organization.

The organization of a domestic society organized on or after January 1, 1998, shall be formed as follows: Seven or more citizens of the United States, a majority of whom are citizens of this state, who desire to form a fraternal benefit society, may make, sign, and acknowledge before some officer, competent to take acknowledgment of deeds, articles of incorporation, in which shall be stated

the proposed corporate name of the society, which may not so closely resemble the name of any society or insurance company as to be misleading or confusing;

the purposes for which it is being formed and the mode in which its corporate powers are to be exercised; the purposes may not include more liberal powers than are granted by this chapter;

the names and residences of the incorporators and the names, residences, and official titles of all the officers, trustees, directors, or other persons who are to have and exercise the general control of the management of the affairs and funds of the society for the first year or until the ensuing election at which all the officers shall be elected by the supreme governing body, which election shall be held no later than one year from the date of the issuance of the permanent certificate of authority.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 6 ch 96 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.84.070.
Filing articles and documents.

The articles of incorporation, certified copies of the domestic society’s laws and rules, copies of all proposed forms of certificates, applications, and circulars to be issued by the society, and a bond conditioned upon the return to applicants of the advanced payments if the organization is not completed within one year, shall be filed with the director, who may require further information considered necessary. The bond with sureties approved by the director shall be in an amount, not less than $300,000 or more than $1,500,000, required by the director. All documents filed are to be in the English language. If the purposes of the society conform to the requirements of this chapter and all provisions of the law have been complied with, the director shall so certify, retain, and file the articles of incorporation and furnish the incorporators a preliminary certificate of authority authorizing the society to solicit members as hereinafter provided.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 7 ch 96 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.84.080.
Time for completing organization.

A preliminary certificate of authority is not valid after one year from its date or after such further period, not exceeding one year, as may be authorized by the director upon cause shown, unless the 500 applicants hereinafter required have been secured and the organization has been completed as herein provided. The articles of incorporation and all other proceedings thereunder shall become null and void in one year from the date of the preliminary certificate of authority, or at the expiration of the extended period, unless the domestic society has completed its organization and received a certificate of authority to do business as hereinafter provided.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 8 ch 96 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.84.090.
Initial solicitations and qualifications.

Upon receipt of a preliminary certificate of authority from the director, the domestic society may solicit members for the purpose of completing its organization, shall collect from each applicant the amount of not less than one regular monthly premium in accordance with its table of rates, and shall issue to each applicant a receipt for the amount collected. A domestic society may not incur any liability other than for the return of the advance premium, or issue any certificate, or pay, allow, or offer or promise to pay or allow, a death or health care benefit to any person until

actual bona fide applications for benefits have been secured on 500 applicants and any necessary evidence of insurability has been furnished to and approved by the society;

certificates of examinations or acceptable declarations of insurability have been filed and approved by the chief medical examiner of the society;

10 subordinate lodges or branches have been established into which the 500 applicants have been admitted;

there has been submitted to the director, under oath of the president or secretary, or corresponding officer of the society, a list of the applicants, giving their names, addresses, date each was admitted, name and number of the subordinate branch of which each applicant is a member, amount of benefits to be granted, and premiums for them;

it has been shown to the director, by sworn statement of the treasurer, or corresponding officer of the society, that at least 500 applicants have each paid in cash at least one regular monthly premium, which premiums in the aggregate shall amount to at least $150,000; the advance premiums shall be held in trust during the period of organization, and, if the society has not qualified for a certificate of authority within one year, the premiums shall be returned to the applicants.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 101 ch 56 SLA 1996; am § 9 ch 96 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.84.100.
Certificate of authority.

The director may make the examination and require further information the director considers advisable. Upon presentation of satisfactory evidence that the domestic society has complied with all the provisions of law, the director shall issue to the society a certificate of authority to that effect and that the society is authorized to transact business under this chapter. The certificate of authority shall be prima facie evidence of the existence of the society at the date of the certificate. The director shall cause a record of the certificate of authority to be made. A certified copy of the record may be given in evidence with like effect as the original certificate of authority.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 10 ch 96 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.84.110.
Constitution and laws. [Repealed, § 36 ch 96 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 21.84.120.
Corporate powers retained.

An incorporated society authorized to transact business in this state on January 1, 1998, may not be required to reincorporate.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 11 ch 96 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.84.130.
Existing voluntary associations.

After July 1, 1967, an unincorporated or voluntary association may not be permitted to transact business in this state as a fraternal benefit society.

[Repealed, § 36 ch 96 SLA 1997.]

[Repealed, § 36 ch 96 SLA 1997.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 36 ch 96 SLA 1997)

Secs. 21.84.140 — 21.84.160.
Articles of incorporation, constitution, and laws; waiver; location of office. [Repealed, § 36 ch 96 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 21.84.170.
Institutions.

It is lawful for a society to create, maintain, and operate organizations to operate not for profit institutions to further the purposes permitted by AS 21.84.015(a)(2). The institutions may provide services free or at a reasonable charge. Real or personal property owned, held, or leased by the society for this purpose shall be reported in every annual statement but may not be allowed as an admitted asset of the society.

[Repealed, § 36 ch 96 SLA 1997.]

A society may not own or operate funeral homes or undertaking establishments.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am §§ 12, 36 ch 96 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.84.175.
Reinsurance.

A domestic society may, by a reinsurance agreement, cede an individual risk or risks in whole or in part to an insurer, other than another fraternal benefit society, that has the power to make reinsurance and that is authorized to do business in this state or, if not authorized, that is approved by the director. However, a society may not reinsure substantially all of its insurance in force without the written permission of the director. A society may take credit for the reserves on the ceded risks to the extent reinsured, but a credit may not be allowed as an admitted asset or a deduction from liability to a ceding society for reinsurance made, ceded, renewed, or otherwise becoming effective after January 1, 1998, unless the reinsurance is payable by the assuming insurer on the basis of the liability of the ceding society under the contract or contracts reinsured without diminution because of the insolvency of the ceding society.

Notwithstanding the limitation in (a) of this section, a society may reinsure the risks of another society in a consolidation or merger approved by the director under AS

21.84.185

.

History.

(§ 13 ch 96 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.84.180.
Qualifications for membership. [Repealed, § 36 ch 96 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 21.84.185.
Consolidations and mergers.

A domestic society may consolidate or merge with another society by complying with the provisions of this section. It shall file with the director

a certified copy of the written contract containing in full the terms and conditions of the consolidation or merger;

a sworn statement by the president and secretary or corresponding officers of each society showing the financial condition of the society on a date fixed by the director but not earlier than December 31 immediately preceding the date of the contract;

a certificate of the president and secretary or corresponding officers of each society, verified by their respective oaths, that the consolidation or merger has been approved by a two-thirds vote of the supreme governing body of each society, the vote being conducted at a regular or special meeting of each body or, if the society’s laws so permit, by mail; and

evidence that, at least 60 days prior to the action of the supreme governing body of each society, the text of the contract has been furnished to all members of each society either by mail or by publication in full in the official publication of each society.

If the director finds that the contract is in conformity with the provisions of this section, that the financial statements are correct, and that the consolidation or merger is just and equitable to the members of each society, the director shall approve the contract and issue a certificate to that effect. On approval, the contract is in full force and effect unless a society that is a party to the contract is incorporated under the laws of another state or territory. In that event, the consolidation or merger may not become effective unless it has been approved as provided by the laws of that state or territory and a certificate of that approval has been filed with the director. If the laws of that state or territory contain no such provision, the consolidation or merger may not become effective unless it has been approved by the director of that state or territory and a certificate of that approval has been filed with the director.

When the consolidation or merger becomes effective under this section, all the rights, franchises, interests, and things in action of the consolidated or merged societies in every type of property, real, personal, or mixed, belonging to the consolidated or merged societies are vested in the society resulting from or remaining after the consolidation or merger without another instrument, except that conveyances of real property may be evidenced by proper deeds, and the title to any real estate or interest in it, vested under the laws of this state in any of the societies consolidated or merged, shall not revert or be in any way impaired by reason of the consolidation or merger, but shall vest absolutely in the society resulting from or remaining after the consolidation or merger.

The affidavit of an officer of the society or of a person authorized by the society to mail a notice or document stating that a notice or document has been addressed and mailed is prima facie evidence that such notice or document has been furnished to the addressees.

History.

(§ 14 ch 96 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.84.190.
Member’s share of deficiency. [Repealed, § 36 ch 96 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 21.84.195.
Conversion to a mutual life insurance company.

A domestic fraternal benefit society may be converted and licensed as a mutual life insurance company by compliance with the applicable requirements of AS 21.69 if the plan of conversion has been approved by the director. A plan of conversion shall be prepared in writing by the board of directors setting out the terms and conditions of conversion. The affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of the supreme governing body at a regular or special meeting is necessary for approval of the plan. A conversion may not take effect unless and until approved by the director, who may give the approval if the director finds that the proposed change is in conformity with the requirements of law and not prejudicial to the certificate holders of the society.

History.

(§ 15 ch 96 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.84.200.
Benefits. [Repealed, § 36 ch 96 SLA 1997.]